Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.726

Youth supports and housing—Community support teams.

(1) Subject to the amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs shall provide additional funding and assistance to contracted youth service providers or other entities who convene a community support team as described in this section. The purpose of the community support team is to help identify supports for a youth focused on resolving family conflict and obtaining or maintaining long-term and stable housing.

(a) The community support team is required to prioritize reunification between the youth and the youth's family to the extent possible without endangering the health, safety, or welfare of the child.

(b) The community support team may not engage with a family member other than the youth if the parent, guardian, or legal custodian objects to the support or assistance that is offered or provided.

(2) A community support team under this section must include:

(a) The youth; and

(b) Supportive adults identified by the youth, which may include:

(i) Licensed shelter staff;

(ii) A case manager;

(iii) Individuals from the youth's school;

(iv) Juvenile court staff;

(v) The youth's attorney;

(vi) Behavioral health providers;

(vii) Community support providers;

(viii) Family members;

(ix) Mentors;

(x) Peer support;

(xi) Housing navigation;

(xii) Legal assistance; or

(xiii) Other community members.

(3) The community support team described in this section shall develop a process that allows youth who enter a licensed overnight youth shelter, or another licensed organization with a stated mission to provide services to homeless or runaway youth and their families to request assistance from the community support team.

(4) Any youth who enters a licensed overnight youth shelter, or another licensed organization with a stated mission to provide services to homeless or runaway youth and their families in an area served by the community support team is eligible for the community support team.

(5) The community support team described in this section shall coordinate efforts, if appropriate, with:

(a) The department or the designated contractor of the department providing family reconciliation services to a youth or family;

(b) Multidisciplinary teams established under RCW 43.185C.250 and 43.185C.255; and

(c) Other nearby youth homelessness assistance programs that may provide assistance to the youth.

[ 2023 c 151 s 5.]